District of Columbia statutes.
47-395.04

Repealed

Reform of powers and duties of department heads.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 732, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11105
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(l), 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 5, 1999, 113 Stat. 3, Pub. L. 106-1, § 3(a)
1981 Ed., § 47-395.4.

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided, in part, that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved Aug. 5, 1997 (P.L. 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded.

Section 47-395.4 had been amended by § 52(l) of D.C. Law 12-264; however, effect was given to the repeal by Pub. L. 106-1.